Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1572
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-1572 to 71-15,171 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Housing Agency Act.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB840, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 92.
July 18, 2026